apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON PROP_ЛАК_SUR
 PROP_КАЛ_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR
 PROP_ОШ_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_SUR
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR
 PROP_КУДО_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-А_SUR
 PROP_КУДО_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SUR
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_sur%>: NMN_КУДО ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Erzya Homestead names !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_HOMESTEAD
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_HOMESTEAD
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_HOMESTEAD
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КУДО ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_PLC
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_PLC
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КИТ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_PLC
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_PLC
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%> LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КУДО ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Erzya settlements !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_SETTLEMENT
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_SETTLEMENT
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КИТ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_SETTLEMENT
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%>О1 LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SETTLEMENT
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>:%> LAT-INDEF ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КУДО ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Divinities !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_divinity%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_divinity%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_ПАНГО_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_divinity%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_divinity%>: NMN_КУДО ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Constellations !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_constellation%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_constellation%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ-PL_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_constellation%>%<sem_plc%>%<pl%>: NMN_ОШ-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_ПАНГО_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_constellation%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_constellation%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО-PL_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_constellation%>%<sem_plc%>%<pl%>: NMN_КУДО-PL ; 

LEXICON PROP_ТЕШТЕ_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_constellation%>%<sem_plc%>: NMN_ТЕШТЕ ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! TEXT NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_TXT
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_txt%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_TXT
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_txt%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_TXT
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_txt%>: NMN_КУДО ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! HOLIDAYS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_HOLIDAY
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_event%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_HOLIDAY
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_event%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_HOLIDAY
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_event%>: NMN_КУДО ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! RIVER NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_RIVERS
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_rvr%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_RIVERS
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_rvr%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_RIVERS
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_rvr%>: NMN_КУДО ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! MONTHS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_MONTHS
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_rvr%>: NMN_КАЛ ;


!!
LEXICON PROP_КАЛ
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ЛАК
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_ЛАК ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_КИТ-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<use_sub%>:%>TLoss NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_КИТ-Def-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: _КИТ-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_КАЛ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_ОШ-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_ОШ-Def-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: _ОШ-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_ОШ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_ТЕШТЕ
 N_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON PROP_ТИНГЕ
 N_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON PROP_ПАНГО
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_ПАНГО-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_ПАНГО-Def-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: _ПАНГО-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_ПАНГО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_КУДО-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;


LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_mal%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ЛАК_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_mal%>: NMN_ЛАК ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_mal%>: NMN_КИТ ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<use_sub%>:%>TLoss NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_mal%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_ТЕШТЕ_MAL
 PROP_ПАНГО_MAL ;

LEXICON PROP_ТИНГЕ_MAL
 PROP_ПАНГО_MAL ;

LEXICON PROP_ПАНГО_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_mal%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_mal%>: NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON PROP_ЛАК_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_ЛАК ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_КИТ ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_fem%>%<use_sub%>:%>TLoss NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON PROP_ТЕШТЕ_FEM
 PROP_ПАНГО_FEM ;

LEXICON PROP_ТИНГЕ_FEM
 PROP_ПАНГО_FEM ;

LEXICON PROP_ПАНГО_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_КУДО ;


LEXICON PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_mal%>: N_ОШ-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_mal%>: N_ОШ-Def-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_mal%>: _ОШ-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_mal%>: N_ОШ-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_fem%>: N_КУДО-Derivation ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_fem%>: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_fem%>: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sem_patr%>%<sem_fem%>: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

!! DECLENSION LIMITATIONS

LEXICON PROP_КУДО-PL
%<n%>%<prop%>: NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!! QUANTIFIER

!! !Now regular
LEXICON NUM_КАЛ_SUB
%<use_sub%>: NUM_КАЛ ;

LEXICON NUM_КАЛ
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<appr%>:%>шка WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КАЛ ;
 NUMORD_КАЛ ;

LEXICON NUMORD_КАЛ
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>це WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>це N_КУДО ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>О1тькс WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>О1тькс N_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_ОШ_SUB
%<use_sub%>: NUM_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_ОШ
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<appr%>:%>О1шка WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ОШ ;
 NUMORD_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUMORD_ОШ
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>О1%>це WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>О1%>це N_КУДО ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>О1тькс WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>О1тькс N_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_СЯДО_SUB
%<use_sub%>: NUM_СЯДО ;

LEXICON NUM_СЯДО
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>:%>О1 WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<appr%>:%>О1шка WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;
:О1 NUMORD_СЯДО ;

LEXICON NUMORD_СЯДО
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>це WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>це N_КУДО ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>:%>тькс WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<nord%>%<der_mwn%>:%>тькс N_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_КУДО_SUB
%<use_sub%>: NUM_КУДО ;

! More work needed 2012-10-08
LEXICON NUM_КУДО
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>: WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<appr%>:%>шка WORD-END ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;
 NUMORD_КУДО ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<coll%>%<attr%>0@P.TLOSS.ON@:нст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<coll_assoc%>0@P.KLOSS.ON@:нек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<appr%>%<coll_assoc%>0000@P.KLOSS.ON@:шканек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<coll_assoc%>:%>не _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<appr%>%<coll_assoc%>:%>шкане _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<coll_assoc%>:%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<iter%>:%>ксть Ks ;
%<qnt%>%<ncrd%>%<appr%>%<iter%>:%>шкаксть Ks ;

LEXICON Nouns
колмине:колмине NUM_КУДО  "" ;
LEXICON Quantifiers
вете NUM_КУДО ;
ниле NUM_КУДО ;
кевейкее:кевейкее NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кевейксэе:кевейксэе NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кеветее:кеветее NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кеветеешка:кеветеешка NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемгавксово:кемгавксово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемгавтово:кемгавтово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемголмово:кемголмово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемготово:кемготово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемнилее:кемнилее NUM_КУДО  "" ;
ниле:ниле NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комсьветее:комсьветее NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комсьсисемге:комсьсисемге NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комсьсисемге:комсьсисем NUM_КАЛ_SUB  "" ;
комсьнилее:комсьнилее NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комськотово:комськотово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комськолмово:комськолмово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комськавтово:комськавтово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комськавксово:комськавксово NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комсьвейкее:комсьвейкее NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комсьвейксэе:комсьвейксэе NUM_КУДО  "" ;
комсь:комсь NUM_ОШ  "" ;
сядо:сяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
сисемсядт:сисемсяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
сисемсядт:сисемзяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
сисем:сисем NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
котосядт:котосяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
кото:кото NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кавтосядт:кавтосяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
кавксосядт:кавксосяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
кавксоньгемень:кавксоньгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
кавксо:кавксо NUM_КУДО  "" ;
ведьгемень:ведьгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
ведьгемень:ветенькемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
сизьгемень:сизьгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
сизьгемень:сисьменькемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
нилесядт:нилесяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
ниленьгемень:ниленьгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
ниленьгемень:ниленькемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
кемзисемге:кемзисемге NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемзисемге:кемсисемге NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемень% кирда:кемень% кирда NUM_КУДО  "" ;
кемень:кемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
колмосядт:колмосяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
колмоньгирда:колмоньгирда NUM_КУДО  "" ;
колмо:колмо NUM_КУДО  "" ;
колмоньгемень:колмоньгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
колмоньгемень:колоньгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
кодгемень:кодгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
вейксэньгемень:вейксэньгемень NUM_КАЛ  "" ;
вейксэ:вейксэ NUM_КУДО  "" ;
вейкине:вейкине NUM_КУДО  "" ;
ветесядт:ветесяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
вейксэсядт:вейксэсяд NUM_СЯДО  "" ;
вете:вете NUM_КУДО  "" ;
